Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-275
Merger of lien with fee; subsequent conveyance; presumption; action to enforce lien, when barred.

After one year from April 13, 1935, in all cases where before such date an interest in the fee title to any real estate in this state and an interest in a mortgage or other lien affecting the same interest have become vested in the same person and such person subsequently conveyed such fee title by deed, unless a contrary intent is expressed by the terms of such deed, it shall be presumed in favor of subsequent purchasers for value and without notice that such lien interest was merged with the fee and conveyed by such deed and that such lien was thereby released from the fee interest so conveyed. After April 13, 1936, no action shall be brought whereby to enforce such lien against subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers for value unless the claimant of such lien shall before that date file with the register of deeds of the county where the land is located an affidavit reciting the book and page or computer system reference where the deed of conveyance is recorded and that the claimant did not intend to merge or convey such lien interest by such deed.

Laws 1935, c. 150, § 2, p. 555;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-274;

R.S.1943, § 76-275;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 16.